New Jersey, session 221, A3288.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Sections 1 through 7 of P.L.1987, c.153 (C.2A:42-84.1 et seq.) are repealed. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall be applicable to a development for which a complete application for development has been submitted subsequent to the effective date of this act.